District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-301.73

Rates for public vehicles to be fixed by Mayor.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1909, 35 Stat. 724, ch. 250
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(c), 33 DCR 703

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-314.
1973 Ed., § 1-223.